Hawaii statutes.
§166E-5 Extension of qualified and
encumbered non-agricultural park lands transferred to and managed by the
department. Notwithstanding chapter 171, the board shall establish
criteria and rules to allow the cancellation, renegotiation, and extension of transferred
encumbrances by the department. Notwithstanding any law to the contrary,
qualified and encumbered non-agricultural park lands transferred to the
department shall not have the respective length of term of the lease or rents
reduced over the remaining fixed term of the applicable encumbrances. [L 2003,
c 90, pt of §1; am L 2004, c 25, §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next